Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
PROBATION

Note

Part heading amended by L 1986, c 314, §20.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Abandonment of Punishment. 16 HBJ, no. 2, at 63 (1981).

§706-620 Authority to withhold sentence of
imprisonment. A defendant who has been convicted of a crime may be
sentenced to a term of probation unless:

(1) The crime is first or second degree murder or
attempted first or second degree murder;

(2) The crime is a class A felony, except class A
felonies defined in chapter 712, part IV, and by section 707‑702;

(3) The defendant is a repeat offender under section
706‑606.5;

(4) The defendant is a felony firearm offender as
defined in section 706-660.1(2);

(5) The crime involved the death of or the infliction
of serious or substantial bodily injury upon a child, an elder person, or a
handicapped person under section 706-660.2; or

(6) The crime is cruelty to animals where ten or more
pet animals were involved under section 711-1108.5 or 711‑1109. [L 1972,
c 9, pt of §1; am L 1986, c 314, §21; am L 1988, c 89, §2; am L 1990, c 67, §8;
am L 1994, c 229, §1; am L 1996, c 197, §1; am L 2013, c 210, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §706-620

The broad discretion vested in the court by §706-605 with
respect to choosing between and among various authorized dispositions
necessitates some statutory guidelines for the exercise of that discretion.
This section states a policy in favor of withholding a sentence of imprisonment
unless, as stated, there is (1) undue risk by repetitive criminal behavior, (2)
need for institutionalized correctional facilities, or (3) need to reflect the
seriousness of the crime which, under the circumstances of the case, can only
be accomplished by imprisonment. The general policy of this section is
supplemented by a statement in the following section of grounds which, while
not controlling the discretion of the court, should be accorded weight in favor
of withholding a sentence of imprisonment.

Previous Hawaii law, while favoring probation or suspension
of sentence by implication, gave the court a free hand--but no guidance--in
selecting the proper sentence or disposition.

Every circuit court, when it appears
to its satisfaction that the ends of justice and the best interests of the
public as well as of the defendant in a criminal case will be subserved
thereby, may after conviction or after a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
(except in cases of [certain specified crimes[1]]) suspend the imposition or
execution of sentence, in full or in part, and place the defendant upon
probation for such period and upon such terms and conditions as it may deem
best.[2]

The Code seeks to provide more definitive criteria for the
exercise of the broad discretion vested in the court.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §706-620

Act 89, Session Laws 1988, amended this section for the
purpose of mandating harsher penalties for crimes against victims who are less
able to protect themselves. The legislature found that passage of these
amendments afforded a greater measure of protection for the groups enumerated in
this section. House Standing Committee Report No. 459-88, Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 2544.

Act 229, Session Laws 1994, amended this section to allow the
court discretion to sentence a defendant convicted of a class A felony drug
offense (as defined in chapter 712, part IV) to probation. The legislature
believed that, in certain instances, the public is better served by allowing
judges some discretion in evaluating all appropriate sentencing and treatment
alternatives available for drug offenders. Conference Committee Report No. 62.

Act 197, Session Laws 1996, amended this section to retain
probation for the offense of manslaughter, which the Act made a class A
felony. The legislature believed that courts should still be given the
discretion to sentence a person to probation in "extremely rare
circumstances where strong mitigating circumstances exist." Conference
Committee Report No. 71.

Act 210, Session Laws 2013, amended this section to prohibit
sentencing a defendant to a term of probation if the defendant is convicted of
cruelty to animals in the first or second degree involving ten or more pet
animals. Conference Committee Report No. 74.

Case Notes

Exercise of court's discretion in applying these standards is
not reviewable on appeal in absence of abuse. 60 H. 314, 588 P.2d 929 (1979).

Defendant's arrest and conviction for two petty misdemeanors
while awaiting sentencing for another conviction demonstrates "undue
risk" justifying imprisonment. 4 H. App. 566, 670 P.2d 834 (1983).

Cited: 73 H. 81, 829 P.2d 1325 (1992).

__________

§706-620 Commentary:

1. Cf. commentary on §706-605.

2. H.R.S. §711-77.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next